src/morphology/hacks/51.lexc
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksansillatuhansilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksansilletuhansille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0kahdeksinetuhansine   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kahdeksansistatuhansista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kahdeksinatuhansina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kahdeksientuhansien   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksiintuhansiin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksansissatuhansissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INSTRUCTIVETRUCTIVE]:0kahdeksintuhansin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0kahdeksattuhannet   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0kahdeksinatuhansia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0kahdeksiksituhansiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksattatuhannetta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksanneltatuhannelta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksannellatuhannella   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksannelletuhannelle   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kahdeksastatuhannesta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kahdeksanatuhantena   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kahdeksantuhannen   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksanteentuhanteen   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksassatuhannessa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0kahdeksantuhatta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0kahdeksattatuhatta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksastuhannes][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0kahdeksaksituhanneksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksittaundekiljardinneitta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksansiltaundekiljardinneilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksansillaundekiljardinneilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksansilleundekiljardinneille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0kahdeksineundekiljardinneine   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kahdeksansistaundekiljardinneista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kahdeksinaundekiljardinneina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kahdeksienundekiljardien   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksiinundekiljardinneiin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksansissaundekiljardinneissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INSTRUCTIVETRUCTIVE]:0kahdeksinundekiljardinnein   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0kahdeksatundekiljardit   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0kahdeksinaundekiljardinneja   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0kahdeksiksiundekiljardinneiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksattaundekiljarditta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksanneltaundekiljardilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksannellaundekiljardilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksannelleundekiljardille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kahdeksastaundekiljardista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kahdeksanaundekiljardina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kahdeksanundekiljardin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksanteenundekiljardin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksassaundekiljardissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0kahdeksanundekiljardia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0kahdeksattaundekiljardia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0kahdeksaksiundekiljardiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksittaundekiljoonansitta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksansiltaundekiljoonansilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksansillaundekiljoonansilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksansilleundekiljoonansille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0kahdeksineundekiljoonansine   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kahdeksansistaundekiljoonansista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kahdeksinaundekiljoonansina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kahdeksienundekiljoonansien   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksiinundekiljoonansiin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksansissaundekiljoonansissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INSTRUCTIVETRUCTIVE]:0kahdeksinundekiljoonansin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0kahdeksatundekiljoonat   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0kahdeksinaundekiljoonansia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0kahdeksiksiundekiljoonansiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksattaundekiljoonatta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksanneltaundekiljoonalta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksannellaundekiljoonalla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksannelleundekiljoonalle   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kahdeksastaundekiljoonasta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kahdeksanaundekiljoonana   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kahdeksanundekiljoonan   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksanteenundekiljoonaan   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksassaundekiljoonassa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0kahdeksanundekiljoonaa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0kahdeksattaundekiljoonaa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasundekiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0kahdeksaksiundekiljoonaksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasviidennettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksittäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasviidennettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksansiltäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasviidennettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kahdeksansilläviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasviidennettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksansilleviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasviidennettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0kahdeksineviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasviidennettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kahdeksansistäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasviidennettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kahdeksinäviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasviidennettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kahdeksienviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=kahdeksasviidennettä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kahdeksiinviidettä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
